Maine, session 132, LD858.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA c. 223, sub-c. 10, headnote is amended to read:
SUBCHAPTER 10
YOUTH BEHAVIORAL AND MENTAL HEALTH FIRST AID TRAINING
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §6672 is enacted to read:
§6672. Behavioral and mental health grant program
1. Grant program. The department shall establish and administer a grant program to
provide grants to school administrative units that contract for behavioral and mental health
services provided by licensed behavioral and mental health service providers.
2. Limitation on use of funds. Funds provided under the grant program under this
section may be used only for behavioral and mental health services that are not otherwise
covered or reimbursable through the MaineCare program. Funds must be used in a manner
that ensures that contracted behavioral and mental health service providers do not supplant
qualified and available school administrative unit behavioral and mental health staff.
3. Grant program funding based on population. In administering the grant program
under this section, the department shall provide grant funds according to the population of
a school administrative unit as follows:
A. Two hundred fifty or fewer students, $3,000;
B. Two hundred fifty-one students to 500 students, $6,000; and
C. More than 500 students, $9,000.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 1 - 132LR1832(06)

EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School and Student Supports Z270
Initiative: Provides one-time funds in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 only for
grants to school administrative units for contracted behavioral and mental health services
for students. The grants are based on the population of each school administrative unit.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $100,000 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $100,000 $100,000
Page 2 - 132LR1832(06)